Hawaii statutes.
§97-4 Manner of filing; public records.
All statements required by this chapter to be filed with the state ethics
commission:

(1) Shall be deemed properly filed when delivered or
deposited in an established post office within the prescribed time, duly stamped,
registered, or certified, and directed to the state ethics commission;
provided, however, in the event it is not received, a duplicate of the
statement shall be promptly filed upon notice by the state ethics commission of
its nonreceipt; and

(2) Shall be preserved by the state ethics commission
for a period of four years from the date of filing; and shall constitute part
of the public records of the state ethics commission. [L 1975, c 160, pt of §1;
am L 1979, c 91, §12; am L 1980, c 129, §1(e); am L 1993, c 52, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next